Massachusetts, session 194th, S1033.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 58 of chapter 207 of the 2022 official edition is hereby amended by inserting 
after the words “advertise his” the following:- “or her”; 
And further, by inserting after the words “telephone number,” the following:- “email 
address,”; 
And further, by striking the words “newspaper, magazine, telephone directory or other 
publication of general circulation” and replacing it with the following:- “printed or digital public 
media, such as a telephone directory, electronic or computer accessed justice of the peace 
directory, newspaper or other periodical, or through written, electronic, computer-accessed or 
similar types of communication, including websites, social media platforms, and digital video 
platforms”; 

of 2 11  And further, by striking the following:- “, that if a justice of the peace uses a business 
card”.